District of Columbia statutes.
16-554

Claims to attached property.

Any person may file his motion and affidavit in the cause, at any time before the final disposition of the property attached or its proceeds, except where it is real property, setting forth a claim thereto or an interest in or lien upon the same. The court, without other pleadings, shall try the issues raised by the claim, with a jury if either party so requests, and may make all orders necessary to protect any rights of the claimant.

History

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 554, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 16-554.
1973 Ed., § 16-554.